North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 4. Department of State Treasurer.

§ 143A-30.
Creation.

There is hereby created a Department of State Treasurer. The head of the Department of State Treasurer is the State Treasurer.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 6.

§ 143A-31.
State Treasurer; powers and duties.

The State Treasurer shall have such powers and duties as are conferred on him by this Chapter, delegated to him by the Governor, and conferred by the Constitution and laws of this State.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 6.

§ 143A-32.
State Treasurer; transfer of powers and duties to Department.

Except as otherwise provided in the Constitution or in this Chapter, all powers, duties and functions vested by law in the State Treasurer are transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of State Treasurer.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 6.

§ 143A-33.
Local Government Commission; transfer.

The Local Government Commission, as contained in Article 1 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of State Treasurer.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 6.

§ 143A-34.
Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System; transfer.

The Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, and the board of trustees, as contained in Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of State Treasurer.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 6.

§ 143A-35.
North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System; transfer.

The North Carolina Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, as contained in Article 3 of Chapter 128 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of State Treasurer.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 6.

§ 143A-36.
Public Employees’ Social Security Agency; powers, duties and functions; transfer.

All of the powers, duties and functions of the Public Employees’ Social Security Agency as contained in Article 2 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, are transferred by a Type I transfer to the Department of State Treasurer.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 6.

§ 143A-37.
Legislative Retirement Fund; transfer.

The Legislative Retirement Fund, as provided for in

G.S. 120-4.1

of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of State Treasurer.

History.

1971, c. 864, s. 6.

§ 143A-38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-491, s. 2, effective January 1, 2008.

§ 143A-38.1.
The Law-Enforcement Officers’ Benefit and Retirement Fund; transfer.

The Law-Enforcement Officers’ Benefit and Retirement Fund, as contained in Article 12 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and the laws of this State, is hereby transferred by a Type II transfer to the Department of State Treasurer.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1204, s. 1.